California, session 20252026, AB912.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3 of the Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District Act (Chapter 17 of the First Extraordinary Session of the Statutes of 1952), as amended by Section 36 of Chapter 387 of the Statutes of 2017, is amended to read:Sec. 3. The Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District shall be governed by, and under the control of, a board of five trustees, as follows:(a) Two trustees and an alternate appointed by, and selected from among, the members of the City Council of the City of Vallejo.(b) One trustee and an alternate appointed by, and selected from among, the members of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Solano.(1) The trustee appointed pursuant to this subdivision must reside within the boundaries of the Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District.(2) The alternate appointed pursuant to this subdivision must be a member whose supervisorial district includes territory within the boundaries of the Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District.(c) Two at-large trustees, appointed by a majority of the remaining members of the board of trustees, who each reside within the boundaries of the Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District and each is neither a member of the City Council of the City of Vallejo or nor a member of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Solano.(1) The appointment of the public members are subject to Sections 54970 to 54974, inclusive, of the Government Code.(2) The first term of the first at-large trustee shall be until December 31, 2027, and appointed to a four-year term thereafter.(3) The first term of the second at-large trustee shall be until December 31, 2029, and appointed to a four-year term thereafter.SEC. 2. Section 6 of the Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District Act (Chapter 17 of the First Extraordinary Session of the Statutes of 1952), as amended by Section 15 of Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 1997, is amended to read:Sec. 6.(a)Each trustee of the district who is a member of the City Council of the City of Vallejo shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per month for their services as a trustee of the board and may receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as trustee, payable from the funds of the district.(b) Sec. 6. (a) Each at-large trustee, trustee or alternate, alternate shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each district meeting attended, whether regular or special, and for any other meeting attended by that trustee, or alternate, at the request of the board as its representative. That trustee, or alternate, shall not, however, be compensated for more than three meetings, or three hundred dollars ($300), in any calendar month. Additionally, that trustee, or alternate, may receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as trustee or alternate.(c)(b) The trustees shall annually elect the following officers from among the trustees to serve for a term of one year: president, vice president, and secretary. These officers shall not receive any additional compensation for their services in their capacity as officers for the board. The finance director or the chief financial officer of the district shall be the treasurer of the district.(d)(c) The district shall remain a legal and political entity separate and apart from the City of Vallejo and shall enjoy all powers granted by this act without exception, including, but not limited to, its operational functions, appointment of staff, planning, financing financing, and contractual authority. The board may adopt and enforce reasonable rules and regulations, ordinances, and resolutions, for the administration and government of the district and to facilitate the exercise of its powers and duties, and exercise all police powers necessary for the maintenance, operation, preservation, use, and enjoyment of its works and facilities.(e)(d) The trustees shall maintain an office within the district for the transaction of the business of the district at which office all books, records, and papers of the district shall be maintained and shall be open to inspection during normal business hours.(f)(e) The trustees shall hold regular meetings, in compliance with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), at those places and those times as the trustees shall, by resolution, prescribe.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 4.This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to protect the governmental structure and fiscal health of the Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District and to ensure that the district’s operational needs continue to be met, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.